Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1337
Board; administrative powers.

The board may rent office space and employ such personnel as may be necessary for the performance of its duties. The board may employ the services of experts and consultants and expend funds necessary to promote air quality improvement programs or to otherwise carry out the board's duties under the Ethanol Development Act.

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 9.
July 18, 2026